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DIC23-03

DTC PO 100/31| Mass orVolume Air Flow Circuit

DTC PO 102/31| Mass orVolume AirFlow Circuit Low Input

DTC PO 103/31| Mass orVolume AirFlow CircuitHigh Input

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The Mass Air Flow (MAF) meter measures the amount of air flowing through the throttle valve. The engine
control ECU uses this information to determine the fuel injection time and provide a proper air fuel ratio. In-
side the MAF meter, there is a heated platinum wire exposed to the flow of intake air.

By applying a specific current to the wire, the engine control ECU heats this wire to a given temperature.
The flow of incoming air cools the wire and an internal thermistor, affecting their resistance. To maintain a
constant current value, the engine control ECU varies the voltage applied to these components in the MAF
meter. The voltage level is proportional to the airflow through the sensor. The engine control ECU interprets
this voltage as the intake air amount.

The circuit is constructed so that the platinum hot wire and temperature sensor provide a bridge circuit, with
the power transistor controlled so that the potential of A and B remains equal to maintain the settemperature.

Temperature Sensor

Platinum Hot Wire

Output
Voltage

Temperature Sensor

7J}7 Platinum Hot Wire

F16929
A09074 A09707

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

Open or short in mass air flow meter circuit for more than 3
P0100/31 sec. (MAF sensor voltageislessthan 0.2V ormorethan 4.9
V) (1 tripdetectionlogic)

Open or short in mass air flow meter circuit for more than 3
P0102/31 sec.(MAF sensorvoltageislessthan0.2V) * Openorshortinmass air flow meter circuit
(1 tripdetectionlogic) * Mass airflow meter

e EnginecontrolECU

Openinmass air flow meter circuitfor morethan 3sec. (EVG
circuit)

P0103/31 Shortinmass air flow meter circuitfor more than 3 sec. (+B
circuit) (MAF sensor voltage is more than 4.9 V)

(1 trip detectionlogic)
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HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCPO 100/31, P 0102/31 or PO 103/31,usethehand -heldtesterto confirmthe MAF ratio
from the ALL menu (to reach the ALL menu: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL).

Mass Air Flow Value (gm/sec.) Malfunction

* Mass air flow meter power source circuitopen

Approx. 0.0
pprox VG circuitopen or short

271.0ormore ¢ EVGcircuitopen

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

If there is a defect in the MAF (Mass Air Flow) meter or an open or short circuit, the voltage level will deviate
outside the normal operating range. The engine control ECU interprets this deviation as a defect in the MAF
meter and sets a DTC.

Example:

When the MAF meter voltage output is less than 0.2 V, or more than 4.9V, and if either the condition contin-
ues for more than 3 sec.

This monitor runs for 3 seconds (the first 3 of engine idle) after the engine started.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the hand- held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, and other data
from the time the malfunction occurred.

1 Connect hand-held tester, and read value of mass air flow rate.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) Start the engine.
(d) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST /
ALL / MAF.
CHECK:
Read the mass air flow rate on the hand-held tester.
RESULT:
Air Flow Rate (gm/s) Proceed to
0.0 A
271.0 or more B
Between 1 and 270.0 (*1) C

*1: Thevalue mustbe changed when the throttle valve is opened or closed.

B > Go to step 6.

C > Check for intermittent problems

(See page DI-3).

2
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2 | Check voltage of air flow meter power source.

Wire Harness Side:

Air Flow Meter Connector

+B

([ ]l2l[3[l4]Is

A21226

OK

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the A20 air flow meter connector.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminal of the mass air flow meter
connector and body ground.

OK:

Tester Connection

+B (A20 -3) - Body ground

NG> Go to step 5.

Specified Condition

9to 14V

3 | Check voltage between terminal VG of engine control ECU connector and body

ground.

(]

P A19522

Engine Control ECU Connector ;4
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PREPARATION:

Start the engine.

CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the specified terminal of the E7
engine control ECU connector.

HINT:

The shift position should be P or N and the A/C switch should
be turned OFF.

, _OK:
Tester Connection Condition Specified Condition
VG(E7 -30) - Engine is idlin 05t03.0V
| IS 1all . .
E2G (E7 -29) g g

RMG630E, page Fl -74).

OK> Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.




DI-46
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

4 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between air flow meter and
engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the A20 air flow meter connector.

Wire Harness Side:

Air Flow Meter Connector (b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
Y A21226 VG (A20-5) - VG (E7-30) Below 1 Q
E2G (A20-4) - E2G (E7-29) Below 1 Q
VG (A20-5) or VG (E7-30) - 10k or higher

=i =T —— Body ground
@ '|||||||||rL|r|a|||||||||\
S SRS RaRa st

VG
v %ine Control ECU Connector NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
K

O

Replace air flow meter.

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)



DIAGNOSTICS -

DI-47
ENGINE

5 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between air flow meter and

EFI or ECD relay.

EFl or ECD
No. 2 Fuse

C

A20872

Wire Harness Side:
Air Flow Meter Connector

11S)))
llIIIIll
7

A21226

000
10000

|

aooaoooe
100a00ne

EFl or ECD
Relay

ol

A20871

OK

Check EFI or ECD No. 2 fuse:

PREPARATION:

Remove the EFIl or ECD No. 2 fuse from the cowl side J/B LH.
CHECK:

Check for continuity in the EFI or ECD No. 2 fuse.

OK:

Continuity
Check harness and connector:
PREPARATION:
(@) Install the EFI or ECD No. 2 fuse.
(b) Disconnect the A20 air flow meter connector.
(c) Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:

Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

+B (A20-3) - Engine Room J/B (EFI or

Below 1 Q
ECD relay terminal 1)

+B (A20-3) or Engine room J/B (EFI or
ECD relay terminal 1) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Repair or replace harness or connector.

o )

Check engine control ECU power source cir-

cuit (See page DI-237).
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6 [ Check continuity between terminal E2G of engine control ECU connector and

body ground.
CHECK:
Check the resistance between terminal of the E7 engine control
/ @ ECU connector and body ground.

iI=haE= OK:
I IHII% I"l"I Ilul I ‘Il Iulz II]l ]llul ; I l"II! I"I"I !II”[ ;
NRRNRENN) [N g gy NREN)|ANRANRRAN Tester Connection Specified Condition

[ ——————

W W E2G (E7-29) - Body ground Below 1 Q

NG Go to step 8.

P A19522 A19630

OK

7 | Check for open in harness and connector between air flow meter and engine
control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the A20 air flow meter connector.

Wire Harness Side:

Air Flow Meter Connector (b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
Oon CHECK:
1 ([1]I=]]3]]4]Is] b Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
——/ tors.
OK:
E2G VG Tester Connection Specified Condition
Y A21226 VG (A20-5) - VG (E7-30) Below 1 Q
E2G (A20-4) - E2G (E7-29) Below 1 Q

VG (A20-5) or VG (E7-30) -

@ i Body ground
LHH”'HH HIHHH,} E2G (A20-4) or E2G (E7-29) —

Body ground

10 k< or higher

10 k< or higher

T

E2G

VG
y Engine Control ECU Connector NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace mass air flow meter.
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8 [ Check for open in harness and connector between terminal E1 of engine control
ECU and body ground (See page IN-20).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).
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